Hawaii statutes.
§195-6.5 Natural area partnership program.
(a) There is established in the department, a natural area partnership program
to provide state funds on a two-for-one basis with private funds for the
management of private lands that are dedicated to conservation. Payments shall
be made from the natural area reserve fund with funds specifically appropriated
for this purpose.

(b) In order to qualify under this program, an
applicant shall be a landowner or a cooperating entity of private land of
natural area reserve quality and shall agree to:

(1) Dedicate the private land in perpetuity through
transfer of fee title or a conservation easement to the State or a cooperating
entity; provided that:

(A) The dedication may be revoked if state
funding is terminated without the concurrence of the landowner and cooperating
entity; and

(B) If a private landowner or cooperating
entity elects to withdraw from the program, the perpetual conservation easement
shall remain in effect;

(2) Have the private land managed by the cooperating
entity or qualified landowner according to a management plan prepared by the
cooperating entity or landowner and approved by the board that meets the
standards established by the department for the system. The management plan
shall include provisions to allow public hunting wherever feasible; provided
that:

(A) Hunting activities shall be in compliance
with applicable laws; and

(B) Game animals shall not be introduced to
any partnership area and hunting shall be conducted as a conservation purpose
of this program.

In-kind services such as heavy equipment and
existing sources of labor may be utilized as a portion of the private
contribution in implementing the management plan;

(3) A penalty payback provision in the event the
landowner or cooperating entity ceases to implement the approved management
plan, unless the board approves modifications to the plan or state funding is
terminated;

(4) Submit an annual report to the board detailing
the year's management accomplishments, areas needing technical advice, proposed
modifications to the plan, and objectives and budget for the coming year. To
facilitate the review, the department shall have the right to make inspections
of the land after notifying the landowner; and

(5) Any other conditions the department shall require
by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1991, c 326, pt of §1; am L
1992, c 180, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next